New York, session 2025-2026, S6252.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The racing, pari-mutuel wagering and breeding law is 2 amended by adding a new section 503-c to read as follows: 3 § 503-c. Prohibition on take-home vehicles. 1. No regional off-track 4 betting corporation shall issue to any board member, officer, or employ- 5 ee of such corporation, any contractor, subcontractor, consultant, or 6 other agent of such corporation, or any spouse, child, sibling or parent 7 residing in the principal place of abode of any of such foregoing 8 persons a motor vehicle. All motor vehicles leased, owned or otherwise 9 controlled by such corporation shall be returned to corporation property 10 when not being used for official business of such corporation. 11 2. Notwithstanding subdivision one of this section, a regional off- 12 track betting corporation shall be allowed to issue take-home vehicles 13 to employees and officers provided such corporation has a written policy 14 on take-home vehicles that is compliant with the office of the state 15 comptroller rules and regulations, that such written policy has been 16 approved by the gaming commission, and such policy and records related 17 to such written policy are subject to random audits conducted by the 18 gaming commission. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 20 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01749-01-5